South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B)(1)(e)(i) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (i) "eligible owner" means: (A) a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States who is permanently and totally disabled as a result of a service-connected disability and who files with the Department of Revenue a certificate signed by the county service officer certifying this disability; (B) a former law enforcement officer as further defined in Section 23-23-10, who is permanently and totally disabled as a result of a law enforcement service-connected disability; (C) a former firefighter, including a volunteer firefighter as further defined in Chapter 80, Title 40, who is permanently and totally disabled as a result of a firefighting service-connected disability; (D) a current volunteer firefighter; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----